California, session 20252026, AB2085.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12510 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:12510. (a) A person, who by themselves, or through or for another person, does any of the following is guilty of a misdemeanor:(1) Uses, for commercial purposes, or retains in their possession an incorrect weight or measure or weighing or measuring instrument.(2) Sells a weight or measure used for commercial purposes, or weighing or measuring instrument that has not been sealed within one year, except a weighing or measuring instrument required to be assembled before use.(3) Uses a condemned weight or measure or weighing or measuring instrument contrary to law.(4) Uses, for commercial purposes, or for determining the charge for a service, a weight or measure or weighing or measuring instrument that is not kept at a fixed location, that does not bear a current or previous year’s seal, and that, upon test by the sealer, is found to be incorrect, unless a written request for an inspection of the weighing or measuring instrument has been made to the county sealer. However, the use of a weight or measure or weighing or measuring instrument used by a public utility in connection with measuring gas, electricity, water, steam, or communication service subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission is exempt from this chapter.(5) Sells or uses a device or instrument to be used or calculated to falsify a weight or measure.(6) Locates or positions a weighing or measuring device used for commercial purposes, except as used exclusively in the preparation of packages put up in advance of sale, so that its indications cannot be accurately read by the customer and operator under ordinary circumstances.(7) Uses, for commercial purposes, a weighing or measuring device designed to automatically compute price unless the computed price is a true mathematical computation of the amount times the price per unit.(8) Willfully and knowingly uses, for commercial purposes, a measuring device designed to automatically compute price unless the indicators of quantity and the total computed price on the device has been returned to zero before the beginning of each delivery of that commodity or thing.(9) Fails to deliver for test to a designated location after receipt of a written notice from a weights and measure official, a device that is ordinarily tested at a central location.(10) Sells, rents, leases, loans, or knowingly installs an incorrect weighing or measuring instrument for commercial purposes.(b) The possession of an incorrect weight or measure or weighing or measuring instrument or records thereof is prima facie evidence of intention to violate the law.SEC. 2.  No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.